District of Columbia statutes.
2-1801.05

Regulations.

The Mayor may issue rules and regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

History

Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 105, 32 DCR 4450

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-2705.